West Virginia, session 2026, HB4839.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WEST VIRGINIA STATE POLICE. §15-2-5a. Geographic Assignment Compensation Differential. (a) Legislative findings. The Legislature finds and declares that:(1) Sworn members of the West Virginia State Police are assigned duty stations by agency command and do not possess unilateral authority to select their geographic assignment;(2) Certain geographic regions of the state experience demonstrably higher housing and residential costs than the statewide median;(3) Uniform statewide compensation, without regard to mandatory geographic assignment, imposes a disproportionate financial burden on troopers assigned to such regions;(4) Recruitment, retention, and operational readiness of the State Police are adversely affected in high-cost assignment areas; and(5) It is in the public interest to provide equitable compensation adjustments that are narrowly tailored, data-driven, and directly related to mandatory assignment conditions unique to sworn State Police personnel.(b) Establishment of differential. There is hereby created a Geographic Assignment Compensation Differential, payable in addition to base salary, for eligible sworn members of the West Virginia State Police.(c) Eligibility. A sworn member is eligible to receive the differential if the member:(1) Is assigned by agency order to a designated geographic zone established pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; and(2) Maintains a primary residence within reasonable commuting distance of the assigned duty station, as defined by rule.(d) Designation of geographic zones.(1) The State Budget Office shall designate geographic zones eligible for the differential.(2) Designation shall be based primarily upon objective housing cost indicators, including but not limited to:(A) Median residential real property values; and(B) Median residential rental rates.(3) Data used shall be obtained from independent, verifiable sources.(4) Geographic zones shall be reviewed and updated no less than once every two years.(e) Amount and form of differential.(1) The differential shall be calculated as a percentage supplement to the member’s base salary.(2) The percentage applied shall correspond to the degree by which housing costs in the assigned zone exceed the statewide median.(3) The differential:(A) Is not base salary for retirement, longevity, or benefit calculation unless otherwise expressly authorized by law;(B) Shall cease upon reassignment to a non-designated zone; and(C) Shall not be retained during voluntary transfer outside an eligible zone.(f) Funding. The differential shall be funded through specific legislative appropriation and shall not diminish any existing compensation or benefits.